Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
SPECIAL DISPOSITIONS; SALES AND LEASES PERMITTED

WITHOUT
PUBLIC AUCTION

A. Certain Agricultural Uses,

Including Special Livestock and Pasture

§171-65 Leases, leases with option to
purchase, sales permitted; when. Land intended for disposition as farm lot
for truck crops or for horticultural, pasture, or special livestock use, may be
disposed of by lease, lease with option to purchase, or in fee simple. Such
disposition may be by drawing of lot, without recourse to public auction,
notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter to the contrary; provided
that the right to any values in the land not attributable to these agricultural
uses shall be reserved to the State.

Dispositions under this section shall be made
only to individuals who satisfy the requirements established by the board and
then only if the individual, either oneself or whose spouse, or both, does not
already own lands of comparable use in the State; provided that the ownership
by the individual or the individual's spouse of lands of comparable use shall
not be a disqualification in applying for a lease within an agricultural park.
[L 1962, c 32, pt of §2; Supp, §103A-61; HRS §171-65; am L 1974, c 231, §3(1);
am L 1975, c 121, §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next